dev/verb/verb.bn.dix
    <pardef n="শ/েখ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>িখছিলাম</l>
          <r>েখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="cnt"/><s n="p1"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>িখছিল</l>
          <r>েখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="cnt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>িখে</l>
          <r>েখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pcnd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>িখেছেন</l>
          <r>েখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="prft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>িখবে</l>
          <r>েখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>িখল</l>
          <r>েখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>িখেছিল</l>
          <r>েখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppst"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>িখবেন</l>
          <r>েখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>িখবে</l>
          <r>েখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="impers"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>িখবেন</l>
          <r>েখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>িখেছে</l>
          <r>েখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="prft"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>িখবে</l>
          <r>েখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="imp"/><s n="impers"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>িখলি</l>
          <r>েখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>িখছে</l>
          <r>েখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="cnt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>িখ</l>
          <r>েখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>িখতে থাকব</l>
          <r>েখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="cnt"/><s n="p1"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>িখেছিল</l>
          <r>েখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="plprft"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>িখবেন</l>
          <r>েখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>িখছিল</l>
          <r>েখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="cnt"/><s n="impers"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>িখব</l>
          <r>েখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>িখেছিল</l>
          <r>েখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="plprft"/><s n="impers"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>িখতে</l>
          <r>েখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>িখেছিলাম</l>
          <r>েখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="plprft"/><s n="p1"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>িখলে</l>
          <r>েখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>িখলে</l>
          <r>েখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>িখতে থাকবেন</l>
          <r>েখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="cnt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>িখিস</l>
          <r>েখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>িখি</l>
          <r>েখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>িখছি</l>
          <r>েখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="cnt"/><s n="p1"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>িখছিলি</l>
          <r>েখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="cnt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>িখলেন</l>
          <r>েখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>িখবে</l>
          <r>েখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>েখা</l>
          <r>েখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>িখতেন</l>
          <r>েখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="hbtl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>েখ</l>
          <r>েখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>িখিস</l>
          <r>েখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>িখত</l>
          <r>েখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="hbtl"/><s n="impers"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>িখতে থাকবে</l>
          <r>েখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="cnt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>িখছিস</l>
          <r>েখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="cnt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>েখ</l>
          <r>েখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>িখেছিলেন</l>
          <r>েখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="plprft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>িখছিলে</l>
          <r>েখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="cnt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>িখছ</l>
          <r>েখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="cnt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>িখতে থাকবেন</l>
          <r>েখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="cnt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>িখেছিস</l>
          <r>েখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="prft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>িখুন</l>
          <r>েখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>িখেছেন</l>

    <e lm="শেখ"><i>শ</i><par n="শ/েখ__vblex"/></e>
